Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF772.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 631.50, is amended to read: 631.50 ALIEN INMATES OR MENTALLY ILL PERSONS; NOTICE TO UNITED STATES IMMIGRATION OFFICERS. new text begin (a) new text end When a person who is convicted of a felony deleted text begin or is found to be a person who is mentally illdeleted text end is committed to the deleted text begin Minnesota Correctional Facility-Stillwater, the Minnesota Correctional Facility-St. Clouddeleted text end new text begin custody of the commissioner of correctionsnew text end , deleted text begin thedeleted text end new text begin anew text end county jail, or any other state or county institution which is supported, wholly or in part, by public funds, the chief executive officer, sheriff, or other officer in charge of the state or county institution shall at once inquire into the nationality of the person. If it appears that the person is an alien, the officer shall immediately notify the United States immigration officer in charge of the district in which the correctional facility, jail, or other institution is located of (1) the date of new text begin the conviction new text end and the deleted text begin reasons fordeleted text end new text begin crime for whichnew text end the alien deleted text begin commitmentdeleted text end new text begin was convictednew text end , (2) the length of time for which committed, (3) the country of which the alien is a citizen, and (4) the date on which and the port at which the alien last entered the United States. new text begin (b) When a person who is found to be either a person who has a mental illness and is dangerous to the public, as defined in section 253B.02, subdivision 17, or a person who poses a risk of harm due to mental illness, as defined in section 253B.02, subdivision 17a, is committed to a state or county institution which is supported, wholly or in part, by public funds, the chief executive officer or other officer in charge of the state or county institution shall at once inquire into the nationality of the person. If it appears that the person is an alien, the officer shall immediately notify the United States immigration officer in charge of the district in which the institution is located of (1) the date of and the reasons for the alien commitment, (2) the length of time for which the alien is committed, (3) the country of which the alien is a citizen, and (4) the date on which and the port at which the alien last entered the United States. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin INMATE IMMIGRATION STATUS REVIEW.new text end new text begin By September 1, 2025, the commissioner of corrections, chief executive officer, sheriff, or other officer in charge of a state or county institution which is supported, wholly or in part, by public funds that houses persons serving a felony sentence shall inquire into the nationality of each person in their custody who is serving a felony sentence. If it appears that the person is an alien, the officer shall immediately notify the United States immigration officer in charge of the district in which the correctional facility, jail, or other institution is located of (1) the date of the conviction and the crime for which the alien was convicted, (2) the length of time for which the alien is committed, (3) the country of which the alien is a citizen, and (4) the date on which and the port at which the alien last entered the United States. new text end